Georgia statutes. TITLE 52 Waters of the State, Ports, and Watercraft
Article 1 General Provisions
52-7-8.
Classification of vessels; required equipment.

Classification. Vessels subject to the provisions of this article shall be divided into four classes as follows:

Class A Less than 16 feet in length (2) Class 1 16 feet or over and less than 26 feet in length (3) Class 2 26 feet or over and less than 40 feet in length (4) Class 3 40 feet or more in length

Click to view

Lights. Every vessel in all weathers from sunset to sunrise shall carry and exhibit lights as provided by regulations of the board.

Whistle or horn. Every vessel of Class 2 or 3 shall be provided with an efficient whistle or horn or other sound-producing mechanical appliance capable of producing signals required by the rules for the prevention of collision enacted by Congress.

Visual distress signals. No person may operate a vessel upon the coastal waters of the state unless the required visual distress signal, including flares, smoke signals, and nonpyrotechnic signals, in the number required and of the type approved by the United States Coast Guard, are on board.

All vessels, when operated between the hours of sunset and sunrise shall carry the United States Coast Guard approved night visual distress signal. If a pyrotechnic visual distress signal is carried, a minimum of three unexpired visual distress signals shall be carried in the vessel. Pyrotechnic night visual distress signals are handheld red flare distress signals, parachute red flare distress signals with launcher, hand-held rocket-propelled parachute red flare distress signals, or red aerial pyrotechnic flare. Nonpyrotechnic nighttime visual distress signals include one electric distress light meeting the standards of 46 C.F.R. Subpart 161.013. One electric distress light shall meet the nighttime requirement.

All vessels, except recreational vessels that are less than 16 feet in length, nonmotorized open sailboats that are less than 26 feet in length, and manually propelled vessels, when operated between the hours of sunrise and sunset shall carry the United States Coast Guard approved daytime visual distress signals. Pyrotechnic daytime visual distress signals include all night visual distress signals as well as floating orange smoke distress signals and hand-held orange smoke distress signals. Nonpyrotechnic daytime visual distress signals include an orange flag meeting the standards of 46 C.F.R. Subpart 160.072. One orange flag shall meet the daytime only requirement.

For the purposes of this Code section, coastal waters shall be limited to those waters defined in 33 C.F.R. Section 175.105(b).

Lifesaving devices.

Every vessel shall be equipped with and carry aboard, at all times, at least one personal flotation device classified and approved by the regulations of the commandant of the Coast Guard for each person on board. In addition to the individual personal flotation device, each vessel 16 feet or more in length, except for canoes and kayaks, must at all times be equipped with at least one throwable device classified and approved by the regulations of the commandant of the Coast Guard.

No person may use a vessel upon the waters of this state unless the personal flotation devices as required in paragraph (1) of this subsection are readily accessible to the occupants of the vessel, are in good and serviceable condition, are legibly marked with the United States Coast Guard approved number, and are of an appropriate size for the occupants of the vessel for whom they are intended; provided, however, that the provisions of this subsection shall not apply to racing sculls, racing shells, racing sweeps, or homemade or inflatable rafts, as defined in subsection (o) of Code Section 52-7-12, if such rafts are operated no more than 100 feet from shore on a lake, pond, or other nonflowing body of water.

No person shall operate a moving vessel upon the waters of this state with a child under the age of 13 years on board such vessel unless such child is wearing an appropriately sized personal flotation device, as required by this subsection to be on board the vessel. This requirement shall not apply when the child is within a fully enclosed roofed cabin or other fully enclosed roofed compartment or structure on the vessel.

Fire extinguishers.

Every mechanically propelled Class A and Class 1 vessel, constructed so as to have enclosed areas which permit entrapment of gases or vapors, shall carry aboard one Type B-I United States Coast Guard approved hand portable fire extinguisher unless there is a United States Coast Guard approved fixed fire-extinguishing system installed in the machinery space. When such a fixed fire-extinguishing system is installed in the machinery space, no hand portable fire extinguisher will be required.

Every mechanically propelled Class 2 vessel, regardless of construction, shall carry aboard two Type B-I or one Type B-II United States Coast Guard approved hand portable fire extinguisher. When a United States Coast Guard approved fixed fire-extinguishing system is installed in the machinery space, one less Type B-I hand portable fire extinguisher is required.

Every mechanically propelled Class 3 vessel, regardless of construction, shall carry aboard three Type B-I or one Type B-I and one Type B-II United States Coast Guard approved hand portable fire extinguishers. When a United States Coast Guard approved fixed fire-extinguishing system is installed in the machinery space, one less Type B-I hand portable fire extinguisher is required.

The carriage of any dry stored pressure fire extinguishers not fitted with pressure gauges or indicating devices or any vaporizing liquid fire extinguishers containing carbon tetrachloride, chlorbomethane, or any other toxic vaporizing liquids is prohibited.

The carriage of any United States Coast Guard approved hand portable fire extinguisher or any fixed fire extinguishing system which is not fully charged shall be prohibited.

Equipment exemptions in authorized races. Subsections (c) and (i) of this Code section shall not apply to vessels while competing in any race conducted pursuant to Code Section 52-7-19 or, if such vessels are designed and intended solely for racing, while engaged in such navigation as is incidental to the tuning up of the boats and engines for the race.

Flame arrester for carburetor. Every vessel shall have the carburetor or carburetors of every engine therein, except outboard motors using gasoline as fuel, equipped with an efficient United States Coast Guard approved flame arrester, backfire trap, or other similar device.

Ventilation. Every such vessel, except open boats, using as fuel any liquid of a volatile nature, shall be provided with means for properly and efficiently ventilating the bilges of the engine and fuel tank compartments so as to remove any explosive or flammable gases.

Rules and regulations. No person shall operate or give permission for the operation of a vessel which is not equipped as required by this article or the rules and regulations of the department made pursuant thereto.

Sale of personal flotation devices. It shall be unlawful for any person to sell or offer for sale within this state any personal flotation device which is not United States Coast Guard approved unless such device is clearly marked as follows: “Notice: This personal flotation device is not United States Coast Guard approved.”

Definition. As used in this Code section, the term “personal flotation device” shall not include flotation devices such as plastic toys, rafts, and other devices used for recreational purposes in or around swimming pools, lakes, or beaches when such devices are easily recognizable as not being designed or intended for use as lifesaving devices.

Penalty. Any person who violates this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 487, § 10; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1427, § 8; Ga. L. 1975, p. 773, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1632, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1182, §§ 4-6; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1743, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 52; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1203, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 52; Ga. L. 1987, p. 567, § 6; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2075, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 680, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 326, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1273, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1000, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 481, § 2; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 52/HB 942; Ga. L. 2013, p. 92, § 4/SB 136; Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 52/SB 340; Ga. L. 2016, p. 223, § 1/HB 172; Ga. L. 2022, p. 762, § 2/SB 469.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added subsections (d) through (g); redesignated former subsections (d) through (l) as present subsections (h) through (p), respectively; in paragraph (h)(1), in the first sentence, substituted “one personal flotation device classified and approved by the regulations of the commandant of the Coast Guard” for “one Type I, II, III, or V (hybrid) personal flotation device” and deleted the proviso from the end, which read: “; provided, however, that Type V (hybrid) devices are acceptable only when worn and securely fastened”, and, at the end of the second sentence, substituted “one throwable device classified and approved by the regulations of the commandant of the Coast Guard” for “one Type IV (throwable) device”; substituted “extinguishers” for “extinguisher” at the end of the first sentence in paragraph (i)(3); and substituted “(c) and (i)” for “(c) and (e)” at the beginning of subsection (j).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2011, the former last two sentences of subsection (j) were redesignated as subsections (k) and (l), respectively.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 326, § 2, provides that the 1996 amendment by that Act shall be automatically repealed on August 25, 1996.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 92, § 14/SB 136, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section by that Act shall apply to all offenses occurring on and after May 15, 2013; provided, however, that for purposes of determining the number of prior convictions or pleas of nolo contendere pursuant to the felony provisions of paragraph (4) of subsection (m) of Code Section 52-7-12, only those offenses for which a conviction or a plea of nolo contendere is obtained on or after May 15, 2013, shall be considered.

U.S. Code.

For federal provisions concerning inland navigational rules, see

33 U.S.C. § 2073

.

52-7-8.1.
Discharge of sewage from vessels on lakes; use of vessels with marine toilets on protected fresh waters; certificate and recordation requirements.

The General Assembly finds that because of the increasing number of vessels having marine toilets which are operated or moored on Allatoona Lake, Lake Blackshear, Clarks Hill Lake, Hartwell Lake, Lake Sidney Lanier, Lake Oconee, Lake Seminole, Lake Sinclair, Russell Lake, Walter F. George Reservoir, Lake Blue Ridge, and West Point Lake, it is necessary for the protection of the public health, safety, and welfare to prohibit the discharge of sewage from such vessels into the waters of such lakes.

Because of the findings stated in paragraph (1) of this subsection, it is declared to be the intent of the General Assembly to protect and enhance the quality of the waters of such lakes by requiring greater environmental protection than is provided pursuant to Section 312 of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended, such that any discharge of sewage from a vessel into the waters of such lakes shall be prohibited.

Except as otherwise provided in the federal Clean Water Act of 1977, P.L. 95-217, as now or hereafter amended, it shall be unlawful for any person to operate or float a vessel, whether moored or not, on protected fresh waters, from which sewage is discharged into such protected fresh waters.

Except as otherwise provided in the federal Clean Water Act of 1977, P.L. 95-217, as now or hereafter amended, it shall be unlawful to operate or float any vessel on protected fresh waters which has located within or on such vessel a marine toilet, unless such marine toilet is designed and operated to prevent the discharge of sewage, treated or untreated, into protected fresh waters and is equipped with a holding tank, as the term is defined in Code Section 52-7-3, which is constructed and installed in such a manner that it can be emptied only by pumping out.

It shall be unlawful to pump out any sewage from a holding tank except into a pump-out facility approved by the department. It shall also be unlawful to discharge or dispose of the wastes from a portable marine toilet into protected fresh waters except into a pump-out facility approved by the department or into a permanent toilet or sewer system located on dry land.

Except as otherwise provided in the federal Clean Water Act of 1977, P.L. 95-217, as now or hereafter amended, it shall be unlawful for any person to operate or float a vessel having a marine toilet, whether moored or not, on protected fresh waters, unless it has a certificate issued by the department affixed thereto immediately adjacent to its registration number. No certificate may be issued unless a marine toilet and holding tank, as the terms are defined in Code Section 52-7-3, have been properly installed on the vessel.

Applications shall be signed by the owner or owners of the vessel and shall be accompanied by a fee of $5.00. A certificate issued under this Code section shall continue in full force and effect, and shall not require renewal; provided, however, that the certificate shall become invalid if it is determined that a false or fraudulent statement was made in the application. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department is authorized to retain all funds generated by the operation of its program to require certificates for marine toilets under this Code section for use in the operation of that program. Any such funds not expended for this purpose in the fiscal year in which they are generated shall be deposited in the state treasury, provided that nothing in this Code section shall be construed so as to allow the department to retain any funds required by the Constitution of the State of Georgia to be paid into the state treasury; provided, further, that the department shall comply with all provisions of Part 1 of Article 4 of Chapter 12 of Title 45, the “Budget Act,” except Code Section 45-12-92, prior to expending any such miscellaneous funds.

This Code section shall apply on and after July 1, 1988, for all vessels on the waters of Lake Sidney Lanier, whether or not they are registered. Each owner of a vessel registered prior to July 1, 1988, shall declare the existence of any marine toilet on the vessel and shall apply for a certificate for the marine toilet at the first date of renewal of the vessel’s registration after July 1, 1988, if said vessel is to be operated or floated on such waters. For vessels registered after July 1, 1988, which will be operated or floated on such waters, each vessel owner shall declare the existence of any marine toilet and apply for a certificate for the marine toilet at the same time application is made to register a vessel. Regardless of any other provisions of this title to the contrary, any vessel which has a marine toilet and which is to be operated or floated on such waters must be registered and must obtain a certificate pursuant to this Code section.

Except as provided by paragraph (1) of this subsection, this Code section shall apply on and after July 1, 1991, for all vessels on protected fresh waters, whether or not they are registered. Each owner of a vessel registered prior to July 1, 1991, shall declare the existence of any marine toilet on the vessel and shall apply for a certificate for the marine toilet at the first date of renewal of the vessel’s registration after July 1, 1991, if said vessel is to be operated or floated on protected fresh waters. For vessels registered after July 1, 1991, which will be operated or floated on protected fresh waters, each vessel owner shall declare the existence of any marine toilet and apply for a certificate for the marine toilet at the same time application is made to register a vessel. Regardless of any other provisions of this title to the contrary, any vessel which has a marine toilet and which is to be operated or floated on protected fresh waters must be registered and must obtain a certificate pursuant to this Code section.

Any person owning a vessel with a marine toilet, who does not obtain a certificate for such toilet as provided in subsection (g) of this Code section, if such vessel is operated or floated on protected fresh waters, and any person who falsifies information about the existence of a marine toilet or holding tank in an application for a certificate, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be subject to the penalties associated with misdemeanors.

Persons operating or floating vessels with marine toilets and subject to the requirements of this Code section shall create and maintain for at least one year after creation records which indicate the name and location of pump-out facilities used and the dates of such use. Persons who own or operate pump-out facilities shall also create and maintain for at least one year after creation records which indicate the name and vessel registration number, the date of pump-out, and verification of pump-out.

In the event any provision of this Code section is found to be in conflict with the federal Clean Water Act of 1977, P.L. 95-217, as now or hereafter amended, such federal act shall control.

History.

Code 1981, §

52-7-8.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1343, § 3; Ga. L. 1989, p. 656, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1218, §§ 3-5; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 52; Ga. L. 1993, p. 459, § 2.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, in subsection (e), commas were inserted following “marine toilet” in the first sentence and “holding tank” and “Code Section 52-7-3” in the second sentence; “of the State” was added following “Constitution” in subsection (f); and a comma was deleted following “creation” in the first and second sentences of subsection (i).

52-7-8.2.
Restrictions on operation of personal watercraft.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Accompanied by” means in the physical presence within the vessel of a person who is not under the influence of alcohol, toxic vapors, or drugs to a degree which would constitute a violation of Code Section 52-7-12 were such person operating the vessel.

“Personal watercraft” means a Class A vessel which:

Has an outboard motor or which has an inboard motor which uses an internal combustion engine powering a water jet pump as its primary source of motive propulsion;

Is designed with the concept that the operator and passenger ride on the outside surfaces of such vessel as opposed to riding inside such vessel; and

Has the probability that the operator and passenger may, in the normal course of use, fall overboard.

Such term includes, without limitation, any vessel where the operator and passenger ride on the outside surfaces of the vessel, even if the primary source of motive propulsion is a propeller, and any vessel commonly known as a “jet ski.”

No person shall operate or give permission to operate personal watercraft on the waters of this state unless each person aboard such personal watercraft is wearing a United States Coast Guard approved personal flotation device, Type I, Type II, Type III, or Type V. Each such personal flotation device must be properly fastened, in good and serviceable condition, and the proper size for the person wearing it.

Reserved.

No person shall operate a personal watercraft on the waters of this state after sunset or before sunrise unless such person is engaged in the enforcement of the laws of this state or this nation.

No person shall operate a personal watercraft on the waters of this state unless such personal watercraft is equipped with a self-circling device or a lanyard-type engine cutoff switch.

No person shall operate on the waters of this state a personal watercraft which has been equipped by the manufacturer with a lanyard-type engine cutoff switch unless the lanyard and the switch are operational and unless the lanyard is attached to the operator, the operator’s clothing, or a personal flotation device worn by the operator.

No person shall operate on the waters of this state a personal watercraft which has been equipped by the manufacturer with a self-circling device if the self-circling device or the engine throttle has been altered in any way that would prohibit the self-circling device from operating in its intended manner.

It shall be unlawful for any person who owns a personal watercraft or who has charge over or control of a personal watercraft to authorize or knowingly to permit such personal watercraft to be operated in violation of this Code section or of Code Section 52-7-8.3.

The provisions of this Code section shall not apply to vessels engaged in any activity authorized under Code Section 52-7-19.

No person shall operate a personal watercraft on the waters of this state at a speed greater than idle speed within 100 feet of any moored or anchored vessel, any vessel adrift, or any wharf, dock, pier, piling, bridge structure or abutment, person in the water, or shoreline adjacent to a full-time or part-time residence, public park, public beach, public swimming area, marina, restaurant, or other public use area.

It shall be unlawful for any person to operate a personal watercraft on the waters of this state while towing a person or persons on water skis, aquaplanes, surfboards, tubes, or any similar device; provided, however, that the provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any personal watercraft designed by the manufacturer to carry three or more persons, provided that such personal watercraft has on board a competent observer in addition to the operator at any time that a person is being towed.

No person under the age of 16 years shall operate a personal watercraft on the waters of this state; provided, however, that a person 12 through 15 years of age may operate a personal watercraft if he or she is accompanied by an adult 18 years of age or older or he or she has successfully completed a boating education course approved by the department. The department may conduct or provide boating education courses to the public.

It shall be unlawful for any person to cause or knowingly permit such person’s child or ward who is less than 12 years of age or the child or ward of another over whom such person has a permanent or temporary responsibility of supervision if such child or ward is less than 12 years of age to operate a personal watercraft.

It shall be unlawful for any person to cause or knowingly permit such person’s child or ward who is age 12 through 15 years or the child or ward of another over whom such person has a permanent or temporary responsibility of supervision if such child or ward is age 12 through 15 years to operate a personal watercraft other than in compliance with the provisions of subsection (l) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

52-7-8.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2075, § 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 680, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 52; Ga. L. 1998, p. 679, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 92, § 5/SB 136.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, “vessel” was substituted for “Vessel” in paragraph (a)(1).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, “sunrise unless” was substituted for “sunrise; unless,” in subsection (d).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 92, § 1/SB 136, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that Sections 5, 6, and 11 of this Act shall be known and may be cited as the “Kile Glover Boat Education Law”.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 92, § 14/SB 136, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section by that Act shall apply to all offenses occurring on and after May 15, 2013; provided, however, that for purposes of determining the number of prior convictions or pleas of nolo contendere pursuant to the felony provisions of paragraph (4) of subsection (m) of Code Section 52-7-12, only those offenses for which a conviction or a plea of nolo contendere is obtained on or after May 15, 2013, shall be considered.

52-7-8.3.
Operation of watercraft; identification; operation by minors.

A person 16 years of age or older may operate any vessel or personal watercraft on any of the waters of this state if such person has met the applicable requirements of Code Section 52-7-22, and such person has in such vessel proper identification.

A person 15 years of age or older may operate a Class 1, Class 2, or Class 3 vessel on any of the waters of this state if such person:

Has in such vessel either proper identification or an instruction permit issued pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 40-5-24;

Is accompanied by an adult 18 years of age or older, in or on the vessel, who is authorized to operate such vessel under the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section, and is ready and capable of taking immediate control of the vessel; and

Has met the applicable requirements of Code Section 52-7-22.

A person 12 through 15 years of age may operate a personal watercraft or Class A vessel on any of the waters of this state in compliance with the provisions of this article if such person:

Is accompanied by an adult 18 years of age or older who is authorized to operate such vessel under the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section; or

Has completed a boating education course approved by the department.

No person between 12 through 14 years of age may operate a Class 1, Class 2, or Class 3 vessel.

No person under the age of 12 years shall operate any Class 1, 2, or 3 vessel or any personal watercraft on any of the waters of this state, and no such person shall operate any Class A vessel utilizing mechanical means of propulsion exceeding 30 horsepower. Such person may operate a Class A vessel, other than a personal watercraft, utilizing mechanical means of propulsion not exceeding 30 horsepower only where such person is accompanied by an adult 18 years of age or older who is authorized to operate such vessel under the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section.

No person having ownership or control of a vessel shall permit another person to operate such vessel in violation of this Code section.

No person shall rent, lease, or let for hire any vessel ten horsepower or more to any person under 16 years of age. On and after July 1, 2014, a person 16 years of age or older may rent or lease any vessel ten horsepower or more if such person has completed a boating education course approved by the department. This subsection shall not apply to any person licensed by the United States Coast Guard as a master of a vessel or a nonresident who has in his or her possession proof that he or she has completed a National Association of State Boating Law Administrators approved boater education course or equivalency examination from another state.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Accompanied by” means in the physical presence within the vessel of a person who is not under the influence of alcohol, toxic vapors, or drugs to a degree which would constitute a violation of Code Section 52-7-12 were such person operating the vessel.

“Personal watercraft” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 52-7-8.2.

“Proper identification” shall have the same meaning as in subsection (d) of Code Section 3-3-23, relating to furnishing of alcoholic beverages.

History.

Code 1981, §

52-7-8.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 679, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1563, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 140, § 52; Ga. L. 2013, p. 92, § 6/SB 136; Ga. L. 2022, p. 671, § 1/SB 553.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added subsection (b); redesignated former subsections (b) through (g) as present subsections (c) through (h), respectively; and substituted “14” for “15” in subsection (d).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 92, § 1/SB 136, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that Sections 5, 6, and 11 of this Act shall be known and may be cited as the “Kile Glover Boat Education Law”.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 92, § 14/SB 136, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section by that Act shall apply to all offenses occurring on and after May 15, 2013; provided, however, that for purposes of determining the number of prior convictions or pleas of nolo contendere pursuant to the felony provisions of paragraph (4) of subsection (m) of Code Section 52-7-12, only those offenses for which a conviction or a plea of nolo contendere is obtained on or after May 15, 2013, shall be considered.

52-7-8.4.
Definitions; anchorage restriction areas; permit requirement for long-term anchoring in estuarine areas; short-term anchoring; safe harbor; exceptions.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Anchorage restriction areas” means areas within the estuarine areas of this state in any location that lies within 300 feet of a marina, 150 feet from a marine structure other than a marina, or within 500 feet of approved commercial shellfish growing areas and designated public harvest areas as determined by the department.

“Estuarine areas” means all tidally influenced waters, marshes, and marshlands lying within a tide-elevation range from 5.6 feet above mean tide level and below.

“Live-aboard vessel” means a floating vessel or other watercraft capable of safe navigation using mechanical means, sails, oars, or other means of propulsion which is utilized primarily as a residence.

“Long-term anchoring” means anchoring a vessel within a 5,280 foot radius of a documented anchoring point where a vessel is anchored for over 14 cumulative days in a calendar year.

“Marina” means a facility that provides fuel, public dockage, public dinghy access, sale of goods or merchandise, vessel maintenance, or other marine services.

“Marine structure” means a public or private dock, pier, bridge, or wharf. Marine structures include, but are not limited to, marinas, boat ramps, boatyards, or other vessel launching or loading facilities.

“Overnight” means all consecutive hours between the hours of 30 minutes after sunset and 30 minutes before sunrise.

“Short-term anchoring” means anchoring a vessel within a 5,280 foot radius of a documented anchoring point where a vessel is anchored for up to and including 14 cumulative days in a calendar year.

It shall be unlawful for any person to anchor any vessel overnight within the anchorage restriction areas. Nothing in this Code section shall prohibit the owner of a vessel from docking at a private recreational dock so long as such vessel is not utilized as a live-aboard vessel.

It shall be unlawful for any person to engage in long-term anchoring of a vessel in the estuarine areas of this state without having first obtained a long-term anchoring permit from the commissioner or his or her designee under such terms and conditions as the commissioner or his or her designee may prescribe.

Nothing in this Code section shall prohibit a person from engaging in short-term anchoring of a vessel in the estuarine areas of this state so long as such vessel is not anchored overnight within the anchorage restriction areas.

No part of this Code section shall restrict the ability of vessels to seek safe harbor in the event of dangerous weather or mechanical failure. A reasonable period of time whereby a vessel owner may seek safe harbor shall not exceed seven days.

Exemptions to the requirements in this Code section may be granted by the commissioner or his or her designee for unique circumstances such as, but not limited to, certain commercial or educational activities.

History.

Code 1981, §

52-7-8.4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 741, § 1/HB 201; Ga. L. 2020, p. 48, § 1/HB 833; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 52/SB 429.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective January 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, effective July 1, 2020, rewrote this Code section. The second 2020 amendment, effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “nonreleasable” for “non-releasable” in former subsection (g). See Editor’s notes for explanation of implementation.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 54(e)/SB 429, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “In the event of a conflict between a provision in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2020 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over the conflicting provision in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act to the extent of the conflict.”

52-7-9.
Boat liveries.

The owner of a boat livery shall cause to be kept a record of the name and address of the person or persons hiring any vessel, the identification number thereof, the departure date and time, and the expected time of return. The record shall be preserved for at least six months.

Neither the owner of a boat livery nor his agent or employees shall permit any vessel to depart from his premises unless it shall have been provided either by the owner or renter with the equipment required pursuant to Code Section 52-7-8 and any rules and regulations made pursuant thereto.

No livery boat, except those having a length of 16 feet or less with a depth of 16 inches or less, shall be operated by any person unless there is on board a copy of the rental agreement authorizing such operation which shows the vessel number, the period of time the boat is authorized for use by such operator, and any other pertinent information that the department may require.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 1427, § 9; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1632, § 4.

52-7-10.
Exhausts to be muffled; exemptions; noise level testing.

The exhaust of every internal combustion engine used on any vessel, excluding those vessels documented by the United States Coast Guard and licensed pursuant to Code Section 27-2-8, shall be muffled or baffled and water injected, except those engines that exhaust through the lower unit or outdrive when the vessel is on plane, so as to decrease noise. Vessels competing in regattas or boat races approved under the provisions of Code Section 52-7-19 may be exempt from such provisions.

The operator of any vessel, when requested to do so by any law enforcement officer authorized to enforce this title, shall submit the vessel to a noise level test.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 1427, § 10; Ga. L. 1980, p. 738, § 5; Ga. L. 1987, p. 567, § 7; Ga. L. 1988, p. 410, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1563, § 2.